Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
111

ASSISTANCE
TO DISPLACED PERSONS

Section

111-1 Findings and declaration of legislative
purpose

111-2 Definitions

111-3 Relocation payments

111-4 Replacement housing

111-5 Not treated as income

111-6 Relocation assistance programs

111-7 Assurance of availability of housing

111-8 Authority of Hawaii housing finance and
development

corporation

111-8.5 Reimbursement procedure

111-9 Rules and regulations

111-10 Conflicts between state and federal requirements

111-11 Fund availability

111-12 Appeals

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next